Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 15, subdivision 4, as amended by Laws 2020, Fifth Special Session chapter 3, article 5, section 25, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Rail Grade Separation on Crude Oil Rail Corridors 71,124,000 (a) Of this amount, $42,262,000 is for a grant to the city of Moorhead for environmental analysis, design, engineering, removal of an existing structure, and construction of a rail grade crossing separation in the vicinity of 21st Street South. (b) $14,100,000 is for a grant to Anoka County for environmental analysis, design, engineering, removal of an existing structure, and construction of a rail grade crossing separation at Anoka County State-Aid Highway 78, known as Hanson Boulevard, in Coon Rapids. Any unspent portion of the appropriation under this paragraph may be used by Anoka County for design costs of other rail crossings in Anoka County that are on the commissioner's rail safety priority list. (c) Of this amount, $14,762,000 is for a grant to the city of Red Wing for acquisition of right-of-way, environmental analysis, design, engineering, removal of an existing structure, and construction of a rail grade crossing separation at Sturgeon Lake Road. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the bond sale authorization and appropriation of bond proceeds for the project in this paragraph are available until December 31, 2024. (d) Any unspent portion of this appropriation after completion of a project in this subdivision may be used for grants in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 219.016. new text begin (e) Any unspent portion of the amount allocated for paragraph (c) may be used for capital improvements to Sturgeon Lake Road in the area of the rail grade separation project. new text end Sec. 2. Laws 2020, Fifth Special Session chapter 3, article 1, section 16, subdivision 39, is amended to read: Subd. 39. Red Wing; Rail Grade Separation 10,000,000 From the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50, for a grant to the city of Red Wing for right-of-way acquisition, environmental analysis, design, engineering, removal of an existing structure, and construction of a rail grade crossing separation at Sturgeon Lake Road. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation for the same purpose in Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 15, subdivision 4.new text begin Any unspent portion of the amount appropriated in this subdivision may be used for capital improvements to Sturgeon Lake Road in the area of the rail grade separation project.new text end